Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-804.02
Clerk, employees; salaries; approval by Governor; expenses.

The clerk and all other assistants and employees of the commission shall receive such salaries as the commission may with the approval of the Governor determine, but not to exceed the amount of the appropriation made for such purpose. Such salaries shall be payable in the same manner as the salaries of other state employees. The clerk and other assistants and employees of the commission shall be entitled, while traveling on the business of the commission, to be reimbursed by the state for necessary traveling expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1974, LB 819, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 82.